Maryland, session 2026, HB0681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
The Charter of Baltimore City
Article II – General Powers
The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall have full power and authority to
exercise all of the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to it by the Constitution of
Maryland or by any Public General or Public Local Laws of the State of Maryland; and in
particular, without limitation upon the foregoing, shall have power by ordinance, or such
other method as may be provided for in its Charter, subject to the provisions of said
Constitution and Public General Laws:
(48)
To provide civil and criminal fines and penalties for the violation of any ordinance,
rule or regulations established by the City under or in the execution of any power granted
by this Article II; provided that no fine or penalty shall exceed [$1000.00] $5,000.00 and
no imprisonment shall be for a longer period than 12 months.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 1 –